Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-138. Driving under restraint - penalty.

Except as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, any person who drives a motor vehicle or off-highway vehicle upon any highway of this state with knowledge that the person's license or privilege to drive, either as a resident or a nonresident, is under restraint for any reason other than conviction of DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD is guilty of a misdemeanor. A court may sentence a person convicted of this misdemeanor to imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than six months and may impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

Upon a second or subsequent conviction under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) within five years after the first conviction thereunder, in addition to any penalty imposed pursuant to said paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), except as may be permitted by section 42-2-132.5, the defendant shall not be eligible to be issued a driver's or minor driver's license or extended any driving privilege in this state for a period of three years after such second or subsequent conviction.

This subsection (1) shall apply only to violations committed on or after July 1, 1974.

A person who drives a motor vehicle or off-highway vehicle upon any highway of this state with knowledge that the person's license or privilege to drive, either as a resident or nonresident, is restrained under section 42-2-126 (3), is restrained solely or partially because of a conviction of DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD, or is restrained in another state solely or partially because of an alcohol-related driving offense is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and, in the discretion of the court, by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. Upon a second or subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ninety days nor more than two years and, in the discretion of the court, by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than three thousand dollars. The minimum county jail sentence imposed by this subparagraph (I) shall be mandatory, and the court shall not grant probation or a suspended sentence thereof; but, in a case where the defendant is convicted although the defendant established that he or she had to drive the motor vehicle in violation of this subparagraph (I) because of an emergency, the mandatory jail sentence, if any, shall not apply, and, for a first conviction, the court may impose a sentence of imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year and, in the discretion of the court, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, and, for a second or subsequent conviction, the court may impose a sentence of imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than two years and, in the discretion of the court, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars.

In any trial for a violation of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), a duly authenticated copy of the record of the defendant's former convictions and judgments for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD or an alcohol-related offense committed in another state from any court of record or a certified copy of the record of any denial or revocation of the defendant's driving privilege under section 42-2-126 (3) from the department shall be prima facie evidence of the convictions, judgments, denials, or revocations and may be used in evidence against the defendant. Identification photographs and fingerprints that are part of the record of the former convictions, judgments, denials, or revocations and the defendant's incarceration after sentencing for any of the former convictions, judgments, denials, or revocations shall be prima facie evidence of the identity of the defendant and may be used in evidence against the defendant.

Upon a second or subsequent conviction under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) within five years after the first conviction thereunder, in addition to the penalty prescribed in said subparagraph (I), except as may be permitted by section 42-2-132.5, the defendant shall not be eligible to be issued a driver's or minor driver's license or extended any driving privilege in this state for a period of four years after such second or subsequent conviction.

Upon a verdict or judgment of guilt for a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (1)(d) of this section, the court shall require the offender to immediately surrender the offender's driver's license, minor driver's license, temporary driver's license, or instruction permit issued by this state, another state, or a foreign country. The court shall forward to the department a notice of the verdict or judgment of guilt on the form prescribed by the department, together with the offender's surrendered license or permit. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection (1)(f) by failing to surrender his or her license or permit to the court commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

(1.5) Any person who drives a motor vehicle or off-highway vehicle upon any highway of this state with knowledge that the person's license or privilege to drive, either as a resident or a nonresident, is under restraint for an outstanding judgment is guilty of a class A traffic infraction as defined in section 42-4-1701 (3).

In a prosecution for a violation of this section, the fact of the restraint may be established by certification that a notice was mailed by first-class mail pursuant to section 42-2-119 (2) to the last-known address of the defendant, or by the delivery of such notice to the last-known address of the defendant, or by personal service of such notice upon the defendant.

In a prosecution for a violation of this section, the fact of restraint in another state may be established by certification that notice was given in compliance with such state's law.

(2.5) A municipality may enforce violations of subsection (1.5) of this section in municipal court. A municipal court shall not waive or reduce the three-point penalty.

The department, upon receiving a record of conviction or accident report of any person for an offense committed while operating a motor vehicle, shall immediately examine its files to determine if the license or operating privilege of such person has been restrained. If it appears that said offense was committed while the license or operating privilege of such person was restrained for a reason other than an outstanding judgment, except as permitted by section 42-2-132.5, the department shall not issue a new license or grant any driving privileges for an additional period of one year after the date such person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or for reinstatement of a suspended license and shall notify the district attorney in the county where such violation occurred and request prosecution of such person under subsection (1) of this section.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

"Knowledge" means actual knowledge of any restraint from whatever source or knowledge of circumstances sufficient to cause a reasonable person to be aware that such person's license or privilege to drive was under restraint. "Knowledge" does not mean knowledge of a particular restraint or knowledge of the duration of restraint.

"Restraint" or "restrained" means any denial, revocation, or suspension of a person's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle in this state or another state.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a violation of this section, based upon a restraint in another state, that the driver possessed a valid driver's license issued subsequent to the restraint that is the basis of the violation.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2155, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1)(f) added, p. 683, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(b), (1)(e), and (3) amended, p. 1082, § 12, effective January 1, 2001; (1)(b) and (1)(e) amended, p. 1358, § 34, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

(1)(d), (2), (3), and (4)(b) amended and (5) added, p. 648, § 17, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) and (1)(d) amended, p. 249, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(f) amended, (HB 10-1090), ch. 45, p. 171, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1882, § 11, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and (3) amended and (1.5) and (2.5) added, (HB 17-1162), ch. 208, p. 810, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 299, § 53, effective September 14.

42-2-139. Permitting unauthorized minor to drive.

No parent or guardian shall cause or knowingly permit his or her child or ward under the age of eighteen years to drive a motor vehicle upon any highway when such minor has not been issued a currently valid minor driver's license or instruction permit or shall cause or knowingly permit such child or ward to drive a motor vehicle upon any highway in violation of the conditions, limitations, or restrictions contained in a license or permit which has been issued to such child or ward.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2157, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1358, § 35, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-131 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-2-140. Permitting unauthorized person to drive.

No person shall authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by such person or under such person's hire or control to be driven upon any highway by any person who has not been issued a currently valid driver's or minor driver's license or an instruction permit or shall cause or knowingly permit such person to drive a motor vehicle upon any highway in violation of the conditions, limitations, or restrictions contained in a license or permit which has been issued to such other person.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2157, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1358, § 36, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-132 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-2-141. Renting or loaning a motor vehicle to another.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no person shall rent or loan a motor vehicle to any other person unless the latter person is then duly licensed under this article or, in the case of a nonresident, duly licensed under the laws of the state or country of that person's residence except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person shall not rent a motor vehicle to another person without first inspecting the driver's license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and verifying that the license is unexpired. The inspection required by this subsection (2) may be performed through the use of an electronic device.

A person who rents a motor vehicle to another person shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of the driver's license of the person to whom the vehicle is rented or any authorized driver under subsection (4) of this section, and the place where the license was issued. The person who rents the motor vehicle may maintain the record in an electronic format and shall make the record available for inspection by any police officer or officer or employee of the department.

A person may rent a motor vehicle to a person who is blind, as defined in section 26-2-103 (3), subject to all of the following conditions:

The blind person is accompanied by at least one person with a valid license issued under this article or, in the case of a nonresident, a valid license issued under the laws of the state or country of such person's residence.

The person renting the motor vehicle to a blind person:

Inspects the driver's license of each person who accompanies the blind person and wishes to be authorized to drive the motor vehicle, which inspection may be performed through the use of an electronic device; and

Verifies that the driver's license is unexpired.

Only persons whose driver's licenses have been verified by the person renting the motor vehicle to the blind person are authorized to drive the motor vehicle, and the names of such persons must be listed in the rental agreement.

The renter and the driver of the motor vehicle pursuant to this subsection (4) shall have the same financial or insurance responsibilities under Colorado law as other renters of motor vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2157, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 136, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2019:

(2), (3), IP(4), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 19-1321), ch. 385, p. 3442, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-133 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-142. Violation - penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this part 1 for which no other penalty is provided in this part 1 commits a class B traffic infraction and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2158, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-134 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-143. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the provisions of this article as enacted in Senate Bill No. 318 by the forty-ninth general assembly in its first regular session shall not supersede, unless in direct conflict, and shall be harmonized with, the provisions of any other act enacted in the same session which also amends, in any way, this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2158, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-135 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-2-144. Reporting by certified level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program providers - notice of administrative remedies against a driver's license - rules.

The department shall require all providers of level II alcohol and drug education and treatment programs certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3 to provide quarterly reports to the department about each person who is enrolled and who has filed proof of such enrollment with the department as required by section 42-2-126 (4)(d)(II).

A person determined not to be in compliance with level II alcohol and drug education and treatment pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be sent a letter from the department notifying the person of such noncompliance, any administrative remedies that may be taken against the person's privilege to drive, and the time period the person has to comply with the requirements for level II alcohol and drug education and treatment before administrative remedies will be exercised against the person's driving privilege.

The department may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 788, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 1, § 2, effective September 25.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1922, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 251, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1181, § 105, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1259, § 24, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 229, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 Second Extraordinary Session act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 1, Session Laws of Colorado 2001, Second Extraordinary Session. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.